trunk/resultats/catalan_i.dic
abassegava/AZ
abonyegava/AZ
abrinava/AZ
acalorava/AZ
acaronava/AZ
acetificava/AZ
acoblava/AZ
acorava/AZ
acubava/AZ
adequava/AZ
adonava/AZ
aerificava/AZ
afeixugava/AZ
afinava/AZ
africava/AZ
agenciava/AZ
agostejava/AZ
aguava/AZ
aixaragallava/AZ
alarmava/AZ
alfarrassava/AZ
allevava/AZ
altejava/AZ
alçava/AZ
amarinava/AZ
amidava/AZ
amorrava/AZ
amuntegava/AZ
angelicava/AZ
anoditzava/AZ
anyocava/AZ
aparellava/AZ
apellava/AZ
apitxava/AZ
apomava/AZ
apressava/AZ
apunyalava/AZ
arcava/AZ
arpegiava/AZ
arrapinyava/AZ
arrendava/AZ
arrogava/AZ
arterialitzava/AZ
assabentava/AZ
assentava/AZ
assonava/AZ
ataquinava/AZ
atirantava/AZ
atrofiava/AZ
autentificava/AZ
averganyava/AZ
azotitzava/AZ
balafiava/A
balmava/A
barbava/A
bascava/A
batxillejava/A
bequetejava/A
bevotejava/A
blasfemava/A
bogejava/A
bonyigava/A
borrimejava/A
boçava/A
brescava/A
bronzejava/A
brutejava/A
buscallava/A
cabriolava/A
calafatejava/A
caliuejava/A
campava/A
canviava/A
capguardava/A
caprificava/A
carbonejava/A
carrava/A
castigava/A
cavallejava/A
centrifugava/A
cimava/A
cisellava/A
clausurava/A
coaccionava/A
cognomenava/A
colorava/A
comandava/A
commocionava/A
complexava/A
conceptuava/A
confeccionava/A
congeniava/A
conjuminava/A
consensuava/A
consultava/A
contraatacava/A
contraordenava/A
contristava/A
copiava/A
coresforçava/A
corsecava/A
creava/A
criptografiava/A
cucava/A
culturitzava/A
datava/A
decapitava/A
defensava/A
dejectava/A
demandava/A
depauperava/A
derrotava/A
desacordava/A
desagermanava/A
desamarrava/A
desaparroquiava/A
desarnava/A
desarrenglerava/A
desatansava/A
desbastava/A
desbrinava/A
descantellava/A
descastellanitzava/A
descolgava/A
desconjuntava/A
descossolava/A
desdelitava/A
desembalatjava/A
desembeinava/A
desembotornava/A
desemmantava/A
desempallava/A
desempatxava/A
desempolsegava/A
desencaboriava/A
desencaputxava/A
desencavalcava/A
desencoratjava/A
desendegava/A
desenfetgegava/A
desengafetava/A
desenguixava/A
desennuegava/A
desenroscava/A
desentabanava/A
desentrenava/A
desertava/A
desfaixava/A
desfocava/A
desgelava/A
desil·lusionava/A
desllogava/A
desmorriava/A
desornava/A
desplaçava/A
dessoterrava/A
destrossava/A
deturpava/A
dimanava/A
dissenyava/A
domtava/A
efigiava/AZ
electroerosionava/AZ
embarcava/AZ
embolava/AZ
embrollava/AZ
emmarranava/AZ
empallissava/AZ
empavonava/AZ
emplafonava/AZ
emprimava/AZ
encalcinava/AZ
encarava/AZ
encepegava/AZ
encofrava/AZ
encrostissava/AZ
energitzava/AZ
enfonyava/AZ
engallinava/AZ
engospava/AZ
enjudiciava/AZ
ennigulava/AZ
enretirava/AZ
ensardinava/AZ
entabanava/AZ
entornava/AZ
entrelluscava/AZ
enumerava/AZ
envoltava/AZ
esbadinava/AZ
esbombava/AZ
esbufegava/AZ
escandallava/AZ
escarritxava/AZ
escolaritzava/AZ
escrostava/AZ
esfondrava/AZ
esgranava/AZ
esmerilava/AZ
esparracava/AZ
espentolava/AZ
espipellava/AZ
espotonava/AZ
esquitllava/AZ
esternudava/AZ
estossinava/AZ
esvarava/AZ
exaltava/AZ
exornava/AZ
extravasava/AZ
faraditzava/A
ferumejava/A
fistonejava/A
fluixejava/A
formatava/A
fraternitzava/A
furava/A
gambava/A
gasava/A
girava/A
gramatitzava/A
grisejava/A
gunitava/A
historiava/AZ
immaterialitzava/AZ
imputava/AZ
indulgenciava/AZ
innovava/AZ
interceptava/AZ
ioditzava/A
justava/A
lignificava/A
llastava/A
llitava/A
madrigalejava/A
maliquejava/A
mantejava/A
masclejava/A
menava/A
metamorfosava/A
mirrava/A
monopolitzava/A
muntanyejava/A
negativava/A
normalitzava/A
occidentalitzava/AZ
orbava/AZ
oxidava/AZ
panegiritzava/A
passamanava/A
pellicava/A
perillava/A
petarrellejava/A
pipellejava/A
plaçava/A
polsava/A
postulava/A
prenyava/A
processava/A
prorratejava/A
quadruplicava/A
radicalitzava/A
raspallava/A
rebatejava/A
recavava/A
recreava/A
reenvidava/A
refutava/A
rehabilitava/A
remeiava/A
reocupava/A
repreguntava/A
resquitllava/A
retorçava/A
revirava/A
roentava/A
ruboritzava/A
saldava/A
sanglotejava/A
semava/A
sililava/A
sobrecongelava/A
sofrenava/A
sonoritzava/A
suberitzava/A
supeditava/A
talonejava/A
taxava/A
terraplenava/A
titulava/A
tosquirava/A
translimitava/A
traumatitzava/A
tributava/A
trumfava/A
uniformitzava/AZ
vaporitzava/A
verinava/A
violentava/A
xacava/A
xerraquejava/A
zefirava/A
